Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.02.060

Bylaws.

(1) The incorporators or board of directors of a corporation must adopt initial bylaws for the corporation.

(2) The bylaws of a corporation may contain any provision for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation to the extent the provision does not infringe upon or limit the exclusive authority of the board of directors under RCW 23B.08.010(2)(b) or otherwise conflict with this title or any other law, the articles of incorporation, or a shareholders' agreement authorized by RCW 23B.07.320.

[ 2020 c 194 s 3; 2011 c 328 s 1; 2009 c 189 s 5; 1989 c 165 s 31.]